New York, session 2025-2026, A8292.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1111-c of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (o) to read as follows: 3 (o) It shall be a defense to any prosecution for a violation of a bus 4 lane restriction pursuant to a bus rapid transit program adopted pursu- 5 ant to this section when an employee of the metropolitan transportation 6 authority is performing authorized duties on behalf of such authority 7 and is operating an authorized employer motor vehicle in the bus lane at 8 the time of the violation and conducting lawful business or providing 9 service to an official metropolitan transportation authority vehicle or 10 personnel while in a bus lane. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 12 the amendments to section 1111-c of the vehicle and traffic law made by 13 section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such section and 14 shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11210-01-5